Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 160.13, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 160.13. As used in the Oklahoma Wind Energy Development


Act:



Req. No. 3215 Page 1


1. “Abandonment” means the failure to generate electricity from


commercial wind energy equipment for a period of twenty-four (24)


consecutive months one hundred eighty (180) consecutive days for


reasons other than curtailment, repowering, a valid judicial order,


or other governmental regulatory action, with no pending


negotiations for purchase. A wind energy facility shall not be


considered abandoned if the owner or operator has elected not to run


the facility, but it has been maintained in proper working order and


is capable of generating electricity;


2. “Commencement of construction” means beginning excavation of


wind turbine foundations or other actions relating to the actual


erection and installation of commercial wind energy equipment. It


shall include the clearing of land, relocation of utilities,


expansion of a wind energy facility, and other actions that would


adversely affect the natural environment of the proposed site. It


shall not include erection of meteorological towers, environmental


assessments, surveys, preliminary engineering, or other activities


associated with assessment of development of the wind resources on a


given parcel of property;


3. “Commercial generation date” means the date on which the


wind turbine in question first generates electrical energy in


commercial quantities;





Req. No. 3215 Page 2


4. “Commercial wind energy equipment” means a wind tower and


turbine with five hundred kilowatts (500kw) or greater of total


nameplate generating capacity;


5. “Commercial quantities” means an amount of electrical energy


sufficient for sale or use off-site from a wind turbine or wind


energy facility, and shall not include amounts of electrical energy


used only for the maintenance or testing of the wind turbine or wind


energy facility itself;


6. “Nonparticipating landowner” means a landowner that is not


under a lease or other property agreement with an owner or operator;


7. “Operate” means activity associated with the management,


operation, and maintenance of a completed wind energy facility and


includes the installation or improvement of a wind energy facility;


8. “Operator” means a person or entity that operates a wind


energy facility;


9. “Owner” means the entity having a majority equity interest


in commercial wind energy equipment, including their respective


successors and assigns;


7. 10. “Person” means a natural person, corporation, limited


liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other private


business entity;


11. “Proprietary information” means commercial or financial


information that:



Req. No. 3215 Page 3


a. is used directly or indirectly in the business of an


applicant submitting information to a political


subdivision, and


b. gives an applicant submitting information to a


political subdivision an advantage or opportunity to


obtain an advantage over a competitor that does not


know of, or otherwise use, the information.


It shall include trade secrets;


12. “Redevelop” means to replan, reconstruct, or redesign a


wind energy facility and includes the acquisition, clearance,


development, disposal, or combination thereof, of a wind energy


facility;


13. “Transmission facility” means a power cable, distribution


line, or other equipment that delivers electricity from a wind


turbine located in this state to the point of interconnection with a


power distribution grid, long-distance power transmission grid, or


other facility by and through which the electricity is distributed


or transmitted to one or more customers. It shall not include


distribution, transmission, or other facilities that are located


beyond the point of interconnection with the power distribution grid


or transmission grid;


14. “Under development” means the execution of land leases on


all real estate to be included in the proposed development, the


commencement of necessary state and federal studies related to

Req. No. 3215 Page 4


construction of a wind energy facility, and the commencement of on-


site physical work of a significant nature on the proposed wind


energy facility site;


15. “Useful life” means the time during which a wind turbine or


wind energy facility is generating electricity in commercial


quantities;


8. “Wind turbine” means a wind energy conversion system which


converts wind energy into electricity through the use of a wind


turbine generator and includes the turbine, blade, tower, base and


pad transformer, if any; and


9. 16. “Wind energy facility” means an electrical generation


facility consisting of one or more wind turbines under common


ownership or operating control, that, cumulatively with any other


wind energy facility:


a. has a rated capacity of five (5) megawatts or more of


electrical energy, and


b. is more than two hundred (200) feet in height,


and includes substations, meteorological data towers, aboveground


and underground electrical transmission lines, transformers, control


systems, and other buildings or facilities used to support the


operation of the facility, and whose primary purpose is to supply


electricity to an off-site customer or customers. Wind energy


facility shall not include a wind energy facility located entirely


on property held in fee simple absolute estate by the owner of the

Req. No. 3215 Page 5


wind energy facility nor shall it include equipment that, when


installed in connection with a dwelling, transmits or uses wind


energy to produce electrical energy in a useful form for residential


purposes;


17. “Wind energy facility expansion” means an activity that


adds or substantially modifies a wind energy facility including, but


not limited to, increasing the height or the number of wind


turbines, transmission facilities, or other equipment or that


increases the environmental footprint of a wind energy facility; and


18. “Wind turbine” means a wind energy conversion system that


converts wind energy into electricity through the use of a wind


turbine generator and includes the turbine, blade, tower, base, and


pad transformer, if any.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 160.14, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 160.14. A. The owner of a wind energy facility shall


be responsible, at its expense, for the proper decommissioning of


the facility upon abandonment or the end of the useful life of the


commercial wind energy equipment in the wind energy facility.


B. Proper decommissioning of a wind energy facility shall


include:


1. Removal of wind turbines, towers, buildings, cabling,


electrical components, foundations and any other associated



Req. No. 3215 Page 6


facilities, to a depth of thirty (30) forty-eight (48) inches below


grade; and


2. Disturbed earth being graded and reseeded or otherwise


restored to substantially the same physical condition as existed


prior to the construction of the wind energy facility by the owner,


excluding roads, unless the landowner specifically requests in


writing that the roads or other land surface areas be restored.


C. The decommissioning of the wind energy facility, or


individual pieces of commercial wind energy equipment, shall be


completed as follows:


1. By the owner of the wind energy facility within twelve (12)


months after abandonment or the end of the useful life of the


commercial wind energy equipment in the wind energy facility; and


2. If the owner of the wind energy facility fails to complete


the decommissioning within the period prescribed in paragraph 1 of


this subsection, the Corporation Commission shall take such measures


as are necessary to complete the decommissioning.


D. A lease or other agreement between a landowner and an owner


of a wind energy facility may contain provisions for decommissioning


that are more restrictive than provided for in this section.


E. A wind energy facility shall be decommissioned or removed


if:


1. A wind turbine ceases to generate electricity for one


hundred eighty (180) continuous days unless the termination of

Req. No. 3215 Page 7


electricity was mandated by state or federal law or was authorized


by the Commission. Two extensions may be authorized by the


Commission for one-hundred-eighty-day periods at a time if the wind


energy facility continues to be maintained in proper working order;


or


2. A wind turbine or group of wind turbines violates the noise


level restrictions pursuant to Section 160.21 of this title unless


the wind turbine or group of wind turbines is brought into


compliance within one hundred eighty (180) days of the violation.


One extension may be authorized by the Commission pursuant to this


paragraph.


F. Within twelve (12) months of the decommissioning of a wind


energy facility, the property shall be restored to its original


condition.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 160.15, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 160.15. A. The owner of a wind energy facility shall


submit to the Corporation Commission evidence of financial security


to cover the anticipated costs of decommissioning the wind energy


facility. For a wind energy facility or portion thereof which


reaches the commercial generation date prior to December 31, 2016,


the evidence of financial security shall be submitted after the


fifteenth year of operation of the facility. For a wind energy


facility or portion thereof which reaches the commercial generation

Req. No. 3215 Page 8


date on or after December 31, 2016, the evidence of financial


security shall be submitted by the fifth year of operation of the


facility with a permit application pursuant to Section 160.21 of


this title. Evidence of financial security may be in the form of a


surety bond, collateral bond, parent guaranty, cash, cashier’s


check, certificate of deposit, bank joint custody receipt or other


approved negotiable instrument as established in rules promulgated


by the Commission.


B. 1. For a wind energy facility which reaches the commercial


generation date prior to December 31, 2016, the evidence of


financial security shall be accompanied by an estimate of the total


cost of decommissioning, minus the salvage value of the equipment,


prepared by a professional engineer licensed in this state. The


amount of the evidence of financial security shall be either:


a. the estimate of the total cost of decommissioning


minus the salvage value of the equipment which shall


be submitted to the Commission in the fifteenth year


of the project and every tenth fifth year thereafter


for the life of the wind energy facility, or


b. one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the estimate


of the total cost of decommissioning which shall be


submitted to the Commission in the fifteenth year of


the project.



Req. No. 3215 Page 9


2. For a wind energy facility which reaches the commercial


generation date on or after December 31, 2016, the evidence of


financial security shall be accompanied by an estimate of the total


cost of decommissioning and an estimate of the salvage value of the


equipment prepared by a professional engineer licensed in this


state. The amount of the evidence of financial security shall be


one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the estimate of the total


cost of decommissioning, minus the salvage value of the equipment,


which shall be submitted to the Commission by the fifth year after


reaching the commercial generation date when applying for a permit


pursuant to Section 160.21 of this title and once every five (5)


years thereafter upon request by the Commission.


C. If the owner of a wind energy facility fails to submit the


information with the Commission as is required by this section, the


owner shall be subject to an administrative penalty not to exceed


One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per day.


D. In the event of a transfer of ownership of a wind energy


facility, the evidence of financial security posted by the


transferor shall remain in place and shall not be released until


such time as evidence of financial security meeting the requirements


of this section is posted by the new owner of the wind energy


facility and deemed acceptable by the Commission.


E. The provisions of this section shall apply to any wind


energy facility or portion thereof entering into or renewing a power

Req. No. 3215 Page 10


purchase agreement (PPA) for the energy generated by the wind energy


facility on or after January 1, 2011. If a wind energy facility


does not sell its energy under a power purchase agreement, the


provisions of this section shall apply to the wind energy facility


or portion thereof which construction commences on or after January


1, 2011.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 17 O.S. 2021, Section 160.21, as


amended by Section 22, Chapter 126, O.S.L. 2023 (17 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 160.21), is amended to read as follows:


Section 160.21. A. 1. A person shall not construct, operate,


or redevelop a wind energy facility or wind energy facility


expansion in this state before obtaining a permit from the


Corporation Commission. In addition, if a political subdivision has


enacted an ordinance that addresses the construction or expansion of


a wind energy facility within its jurisdiction, permission shall be


obtained from the political subdivision. Subject to the approval of


the Commission, a permit issued pursuant to this section may be


transferred to a person that agrees to comply with the terms of the


permit. A filing fee of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00) shall be submitted with each permit application.


2. The owner of a wind energy facility shall submit


notification of intent to build a facility a permit application to


the Corporation Commission within six (6) months of the initial


filing with the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) of a FAA 7460-

Req. No. 3215 Page 11


form. The Corporation Commission shall prescribe the form and


submittal requirements of the notification permit application;


provided, the information required on the notification permit


application form shall include at least the same information


required on the FAA form and, a map of the project boundary, a


complete description of the wind energy facility including the


number and size of the wind turbines, the proposed timeline for


construction and operation of the wind energy facility, and a


development and management plan. The development and management


plan shall address physical characteristics of the wind energy


facility; electric standards that meet national electric codes;


construction, operation, and maintenance standards that comply with


all building codes and ensure maintenance in a manner that protects


the public and complies with all requirements of this subsection;


and emergency procedures. The emergency procedures shall include:


a. a way to provide notice to the Oklahoma Department of


Emergency Management and local emergency agencies


within twenty-four (24) hours of an emergency,


b. directions to address an emergency situation,


including written procedures to shut down the wind


energy facility or a portion of the facility as


necessary, and


c. an emergency evacuation plan for an area within four


(4) miles of a wind energy facility, including the

Req. No. 3215 Page 12


location of alternate landing zones for emergency


service aircraft.


The emergency procedures shall be reviewed at least annually by


the owner or operator of the wind energy facility in collaboration


with the fire department, law enforcement, and other appropriate


first responders as necessary. Copies of the emergency procedures


shall be distributed to the local legislative body, first


responders, and supervisors or employees of the wind energy


facility.


3. The owner of a wind energy facility shall submit to the


Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics copies of all


initial FAA 7460-1 forms for all individual wind turbines or any


other individual structure that requires a FAA Form 7460-1 that is


part of a wind energy facility within thirty (30) days of the


initial filing with the FAA. The Oklahoma Department of Aerospace


and Aeronautics shall prescribe the submittal requirements for the


7460-1 form.


4. The owner of the wind energy facility shall send copies of


the notification permit application to the board of county


commissioners of every county in which all or a portion of the wind


energy facility is to be located within twenty-four (24) hours of


filing with the Corporation Commission. If all or a portion of the


wind energy facility is to be located within the incorporated area


of a municipality, copies of the notification permit application

Req. No. 3215 Page 13


shall also be sent to the governing body of the municipality within


twenty-four (24) hours of filing with the Corporation Commission.


In addition to sending copies of the permit application to the


county commissioners and the governing body of a municipality, if


necessary, the owner of the wind energy facility shall send a copy


of the permit application to the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation


Department, the county clerk of every county in which all or a


portion of the wind energy facility is to be located, and any


landowner and resident located within four (4) miles of the proposed


location of the wind energy facility or wind energy facility


expansion within twenty-four (24) hours of filing with the


Corporation Commission.


If the owner of a wind energy facility is required to file


subsequent 7460-1 forms with the FAA due to changing locations or


heights of individual structures from the locations or heights


originally proposed in the initial 7460-1 forms submitted to the


Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics, the owner shall,


within ten (10) days of filing with the FAA, submit such subsequent


7460-1 forms to the Corporation Commission and Oklahoma Department


of Aerospace and Aeronautics. A wind energy facility owner shall


not be required to start the notification processes over unless the


subsequent 7460-1 forms expand the project beyond its original


boundaries submitted to the Corporation Commission.



Req. No. 3215 Page 14


B. Within ten (10) days of receiving a FAA 7460-1 form, as


provided for in subsection A of this section, the Oklahoma


Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics shall notify the Oklahoma


Strategic Military Planning Commission. The Oklahoma Strategic


Military Planning Commission shall notify local base commanders upon


receipt of this notification. The Oklahoma Strategic Military


Planning Commission shall submit a letter to the Military Aviation


and Installation Assurance Siting Clearinghouse outlining potential


areas of impact, as provided in Section 160.20 of this title, within


thirty (30) days of receipt of the notification. The letter from


the Oklahoma Strategic Military Planning Commission shall be


submitted to the Corporation Commission, the Oklahoma Department of


Aerospace and Aeronautics, and the wind energy facility owner at the


same time the letter is submitted to the Clearinghouse.


C. Within six (6) months of submitting the notification permit


application with the Corporation Commission as provided for in


subsection A of this section, the owner of the wind energy facility


shall cause a copy of the notification permit application to be


published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or


counties in which all or a portion of the wind energy facility is to


be located. Proof of publication shall be submitted to the


Corporation Commission.


D. Within six (6) months of submitting the notification permit


application with the Corporation Commission as provided in

Req. No. 3215 Page 15


subsection A of this section, the owner of the wind energy facility


shall cause a copy of the notification permit application to be


sent, by certified mail, to:


1. Any oil and gas operator, as reflected in the records of the


Corporation Commission, who is conducting oil and gas operations


upon all or any part of the surface estate as to which the wind


energy developer intends the construction of the wind energy


facility;


2. Any oil and gas operator, as reflected in the records of the


Corporation Commission, of an unspaced unit, or a unit created by


order of the Corporation Commission, who is conducting oil and gas


operations for the unit where all or any part of the unit area is


within the geographical boundaries of the surface estate as to which


the wind energy developer intends the construction of the wind


energy facility; and


3. As to tracts of land not described in paragraphs 1 and 2 of


this subsection on which the wind energy developer intends to


construct a wind energy facility, all lessees of oil and gas leases


covering the mineral estate underlying any part of the tracts of


land that are filed of record with the county clerk in the county


where the tracts are located and whose primary term has not expired.


If the wind energy developer makes a search with reasonable


diligence, and the whereabouts of a party entitled to any notice


described in this subsection cannot be ascertained or such notice

Req. No. 3215 Page 16


cannot be delivered, then an affidavit attesting to such diligent


search for the parties shall be placed in the records of the county


clerk where the surface estate is actually located.


E. Within sixty (60) days of publishing the notification permit


application in a newspaper as provided for in subsection C of this


section, the owner of the wind energy facility shall hold a public


meeting. Notice of the public meeting shall be published in a


newspaper of general circulation and submitted to the board of


county commissioners in the county or counties in which all or a


portion of the wind energy facility is to be located. The notice


shall contain the place, date, and time of the public meeting.


Proof of publication of the notice shall be submitted to the


Corporation Commission. The public meeting shall be held in one of


the counties each county in which all or a portion of the wind


energy facility is to be located or expanded.


F. With regard to the surface estate upon which the owner of a


wind energy facility intends to construct a wind energy facility, at


least sixty (60) days before entering upon the surface estate for


the purposes of commencement of construction of the wind energy


facility, the owner shall provide written notice, by certified mail,


of its intent to construct the wind energy facility to:


1. Any oil and gas operator, as reflected in the records of the


Corporation Commission, who is conducting oil and gas operations


upon all or any part of the surface estate as to which the wind

Req. No. 3215 Page 17


energy developer intends the construction of the wind energy


facility;


2. Any oil and gas operator, as reflected in the records of the


Corporation Commission, of an unspaced unit, or a unit created by


order of the Corporation Commission, who is conducting oil and gas


operations for the unit where all or any part of the unit area is


within the geographical boundaries of the surface estate as to which


the wind energy developer intends the construction of the wind


energy facility; and


3. As to tracts of land not described in paragraphs 1 and 2 of


this subsection on which the wind energy developer intends to


construct a wind energy facility, all lessees of oil and gas leases


covering the mineral estate underlying any part of the tracts of


land that are filed of record with the county clerk in the county


where the tracts are located and whose primary term has not expired.


The notice shall contain a map or plat of the proposed location,


with sufficient specificity of all of the various elements of the


wind energy facility to be located on the governmental section which


includes all or any part of the tracts of land described in


paragraphs 1, 2, and 3 of this subsection and the approximate date


that the owner of the wind energy facility proposes to commence


construction. If the wind energy developer makes a search with


reasonable diligence, and the whereabouts of a party entitled to any


notice described in this subsection cannot be ascertained or such

Req. No. 3215 Page 18


notice cannot be delivered, then an affidavit attesting to such


diligent search for the parties shall be placed in the records of


the county clerk where the surface estate is actually located.


Within thirty (30) days of receiving such notice, any oil and gas


operator, as described in paragraphs 1, 2, and 3 of this subsection


shall reciprocate, in writing by certified mail, certain site,


operational and infrastructure information, with sufficient


specificity, to be shared with the owner of the wind energy facility


to assist both with the safe construction and operation pertaining


to the surface estate. This information should include American


Land Title Association (ALTA) surveys of existing subsurface and


surface improvements on the property, if any, as well as other


technical specifications for existing improvements such as pipe


size, material, capacity and depth.


G. The owner of a wind energy facility shall not commence


construction on the facility until the notification and public


meeting requirements of this section have been met. If an owner of


a wind energy facility fails to submit the information as required


in this section, the owner shall be subject to an administrative


penalty from the Corporation Commission not to exceed One Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per day, per violation as provided


by law.





Req. No. 3215 Page 19


H. The Corporation Commission shall establish that the


applicant has met the following minimum requirements before


approving a permit application:


1. The minimum setback for the base of any wind turbine from a


nonparticipating landowner’s property line shall be equal to the


greater of one quarter (1/4) of a nautical mile or two (2) times the


total height of the wind turbine as measured from the ground at its


base to the maximum height of the blade tip. A nonparticipating


landowner may elect to sign a waiver that allows a wind turbine or


group of wind turbines to be placed up to one and one-tenth (1.1)


times the total height of the wind turbine as measured from the


ground at its base to the maximum height of the blade tip from the


nonparticipating landowner’s property line;


2. The minimum setback from the base of a wind turbine shall be


one half (1/2) of a nautical mile from any residential structure


that exists at the time the permit application is submitted to the


Corporation Commission;


3. An environmental impact assessment, conducted by a qualified


third-party expert approved by the Corporation Commission and paid


for by the applicant, of the potential adverse impacts within four


(4) miles of the perimeter of the wind energy facility or wind


energy facility expansion. The environmental impact assessment


shall include, but not be limited to, a study of the:



Req. No. 3215 Page 20


a. economic impacts to individuals, real property values,


tourism, and agriculture,


b. compliance with state and national fire, building, and


electrical codes,


c. impact on wildlife including potential adverse impacts


to wildlife refuges, preserves and management areas,


habitats for threatened or endangered species, primary


nursery areas as designated by the Oklahoma Wildlife


Conservation Commission, and critical fishery habitats


as identified by state or federal law,


d. viewshed analysis for state and federal parks and


forests, historic and cultural sites, public parks and


recreation areas, and private conservation land, and


e. bodies of water within four (4) miles of the perimeter


of the wind energy facility or wind energy facility


expansion, including flowing water sources, stormwater


runoff, wetlands, groundwater, aquifers, and private


wells.


Such environmental impact assessment shall not be required if an


environmental review of the wind energy facility or any portion of


the wind energy facility is required pursuant to the National


Environmental Policy Act of 1969 that includes public input, a


public hearing, an environmental impact statement, and a viewshed


analysis;

Req. No. 3215 Page 21


4. A risk assessment and mitigation recommendations for shadow


flicker and other incidents, including wind turbine fires,


structural damage or failure, ice throw, blade shear, and hazardous


material spills. Shadow flicker shall not exceed thirty (30) hours


annually as verified in an assessment prepared according to industry


standards. A nonparticipating landowner may elect to sign a written


waiver to allow shadow flicker, ice throw, or blade shear from any


wind turbine on the nonparticipating landowner’s property;


5. A risk assessment for civil air navigation, military or law


enforcement routes or training exercises, emergency medical flights,


radar operations, and mobile phone services;


6. A risk assessment for lighting requirements beyond those


required by the Federal Aviation Administration; and


7. A baseline determination of preconstruction noise levels,


including modeling and enforcement, conducted by a qualified third-


party acoustics expert paid for by the applicant. Except during an


event of inclement weather that prevents an operator from


controlling the noise level of one or more wind turbines, the noise


emission limit at a nonparticipating landowner’s dwelling shall not


exceed thirty-five A-weighted decibels (35 dBA). The emission limit


at a nonparticipating landowner’s property line shall not exceed


forty-five A-weighted decibels (45 dBA). A nonparticipating


landowner may elect to sign a written waiver to allow for noise


levels that exceed such limits.

Req. No. 3215 Page 22


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 160.24 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Upon receipt of an application for a permit for the


construction, operation, or redevelopment of a wind energy facility


or a wind energy facility expansion pursuant to Section 160.21 of


Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the Corporation Commission shall


notify executive agencies of this state requesting comments


regarding the adequacy of a permit application.


B. Comments shall be received within one hundred twenty (120)


days after the notification from the Commission unless an agency


requests a longer period to consider the permit application.


C. Upon review of comments received, if any, the Commission


shall determine whether the applicant failed to include or


adequately develop relevant environmental or economic impacts


associated with the wind energy facility as required pursuant to


Section 160.21 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The Commission


shall issue a letter to the applicant if there are deficiencies in


the application. The letter shall be prepared and served to the


applicant no later than twenty (20) days before the date for a


public hearing pursuant to subsection D of this section. The


applicant shall promptly respond to the letter and the public


hearing shall be deferred unless the applicant has responded before


the hearing.

Req. No. 3215 Page 23


D. A public hearing shall be set no earlier than sixty (60)


days after the notification date for comments from executive


agencies. The testimony presented at the hearing may be presented


in writing or orally; provided, the Commission may promulgate rules


designed to exclude repetitive, redundant, or irrelevant testimony.


After the public hearing, the Commission may deny, grant, or


conditionally grant the permit.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 160.25 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, a permit


application for the construction, operation, or redevelopment of a


wind energy facility or a wind energy facility expansion and other


documents required pursuant to this act are subject to disclosure


under the Oklahoma Open Records Act and the federal Freedom of


Information Act.


B. Proprietary information contained in a permit application or


other documents required pursuant to this act or documents used by


the Commission to evaluate and approve or deny a permit application


shall remain confidential and not subject to disclosure under the


Oklahoma Open Records Act or the federal Freedom of Information Act.


SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3215 CN 1/15/2026 1:07:00 PM

Req. No. 3215 Page 24